California statutes. Penal Code
(c) The training shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:

(1) Recognizing indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(2) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.

(3) Use of force options and alternatives.

(4) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(5) Mental health resources available to the first responders to events that involve mentally disabled persons.

(d) The course of instruction shall be at least 15 hours, and shall include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities relating to law enforcement interaction with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(e) The course shall be presented within the existing hours allotted for the regular basic course.

(f) The commission shall implement this section on or before August 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 54.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.27.

(a) The commission shall establish and keep updated a classroom-based continuing training course that includes instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, relating to behavioral health and law enforcement interaction with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(b) This course shall be at least three consecutive hours, may include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities, shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:

(1) The cause and nature of mental
 illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(2) Indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(3) Appropriate responses to a variety of situations involving persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(4) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.

(5) Appropriate language usage when interacting with potentially emotionally distressed persons.

(6) Resources available to serve persons with mental illness or
 intellectual disability.

(7) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(c) The course described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be made available by the commission to each law enforcement officer with a rank of supervisor or below and who is assigned to patrol duties or to supervise officers who are assigned to patrol duties.

(d) The commission shall implement this section on or before August 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 55.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.28.

(a) (1) The commission shall require the field training officers who provide instruction in the field training program to have at least eight hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training to better train new peace officers on how to effectively interact with persons with mental illness or intellectual disability. This course shall include classroom instruction and instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, and shall be taught in segments that are at least four hours long.

(2) If a field training officer has completed eight hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training within the past 24 months, or if a field
 training officer has completed 40 hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training, the requirement described in paragraph (1) shall not apply.

(b) The crisis intervention behavioral health training shall address issues relating to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:

(1) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and intellectual disabilities.

(2) (A) How to identify indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(B) How to distinguish between mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(C) How to respond appropriately in a variety of situations involving persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and
 substance use disorders.

(3) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.

(4) Appropriate language usage when interacting with potentially emotionally distressed persons.

(5) Community and state resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement.

(6) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(c) Field training officers assigned or appointed
 before January 1, 2017, shall complete the crisis intervention behavioral health training by June 30, 2017. Field training officers assigned or appointed on or after January 1, 2017, shall complete the crisis intervention behavioral health training within 180 days of assignment or appointment.

(d) This section does not prevent an agency from requiring its field training officers to complete additional hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training or requiring its field training officers to complete that training earlier than as required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 56.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.29.

(a) The commission shall establish and keep updated a field training officer course relating to competencies of the field training program and police training program that addresses how to interact with persons with mental illness or intellectual disability.

(b) This course shall consist of at least four hours of classroom instruction and instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, shall address issues related to stigma, and shall be culturally relevant and appropriate.

(c) All prospective field training officers shall complete the course described in subdivisions (a) and (b) as part of the existing field training
 officer program.

(d) The commission shall implement the provisions of this section on or before August 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (SB 29)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.295.

(a) The commission shall, by May 1, 2016, conduct a review and evaluation of the required competencies of the field training program and police training program to identify areas where additional training is necessary to better prepare law enforcement officers to effectively address incidents involving persons with a mental illness or intellectual disability.

(b) Upon identifying what additional training is needed, the commission shall update the training in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations, and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness, intellectual disabilities, and substance abuse disorders, and with appropriate consumer
 and family advocate groups.

(c) The training shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:

(1) How to identify indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, substance use disorders, neurological disorders, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, and dementia.

(2) Autism spectrum disorder.

(3) Genetic disorders, including, but not limited to, Down syndrome.

(4) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.

(5) Alternatives to the use of force when interacting with potentially dangerous persons with mental illness or intellectual disabilities.

(6) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.

(7) Involuntary holds.

(8) Community and state resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 57.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.30.

(a) By July 1, 2015, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall establish and keep updated a continuing education training course relating to law enforcement interaction with mentally disabled and developmentally disabled persons living within a state mental hospital or state developmental center. The training course shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness and developmental disability, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate groups. In developing the course, the commission shall also examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to mentally disabled and
 developmentally disabled persons. The commission shall make the course available to all law enforcement agencies in California, and the course shall be required for law enforcement personnel serving in law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over state mental hospitals and state developmental centers, as part of the agency’s officer training program.

(b) The course described in subdivision (a) may consist of video-based or classroom instruction. The course shall include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of the following:

(1) The prevalence, cause, and nature of mental illnesses and developmental disabilities.

(2) The unique characteristics, barriers, and challenges of individuals who may be a victim of abuse or
 exploitation living within a state mental hospital or state developmental center.

(3) How to accommodate, interview, and converse with individuals who may require assistive devices in order to express themselves.

(4) Capacity and consent of individuals with cognitive and intellectual barriers.

(5) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons.

(6) Appropriate language usage when interacting with mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons.

(7) Community and state resources and
 advocacy support and services available to serve mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement to benefit the mentally disabled or developmentally disabled community.

(8) The fact that a crime committed in whole or in part because of an actual or perceived disability of the victim is a hate crime punishable under Title 11.6 (commencing with Section 422.55) of Part 1.

(9) Information on the state mental hospital system and the state developmental center system.

(10) Techniques in conducting forensic investigations within institutional settings where jurisdiction may be shared.

(11) Examples of abuse and exploitation perpetrated by caregivers, staff, contractors, or administrators of state mental hospitals and state developmental centers, and how to conduct investigations in instances where a perpetrator may also be a caregiver or provider of therapeutic or other services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 58.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.35.

(a) The commission shall, upon the next regularly scheduled review of a training module relating to persons with disabilities, create and make available on DVD and may distribute electronically a course on how to recognize and interact with persons with autistic spectrum disorders. This course shall be designed for, and made available to, peace officers who are first responders to emergency situations.

(b) The training course shall be developed by the commission in consultation with the Department of Developmental Services and appropriate community, local, or other state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorders. The commission shall make the course available to law enforcement agencies in California.

(c) In addition to the duties contained in subdivisions (a) and (b), the commission shall distribute, as necessary, a training bulletin via the Internet to law enforcement agencies participating in the commission’s program on the topic of autism spectrum disorders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 621, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.36.

(a) The commission shall meet with the Department of Veterans Affairs and community, local, or other state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of traumatic brain injury (TBI) and post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) in order to assess the training needed by peace officers, who are first responders in emergency situations, on the topic of returning veterans or other persons suffering from TBI or PTSD.

(b) Should the commission determine that there is an unfulfilled need for training on TBI and PTSD, the commission shall determine the training format that is both fiscally responsible and meets the training needs of the greatest number of officers.

(c) Should the commission determine that there is an unfulfilled need for training on TBI and PTSD, the commission shall,
 upon the next regularly scheduled review of a training module relating to persons with disabilities, create and make available on DVD and may distribute electronically, or provide by means of another form or method of training, a course on how to recognize and interact with returning veterans or other persons suffering from TBI or PTSD. This course shall be designed for, and made available to, peace officers who are first responders to emergency situations.

(d) The training course shall be developed by the commission in consultation with the Department of Veterans Affairs and appropriate community, local, or other state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of TBI and PTSD. The commission shall make the course available to law enforcement agencies in California.

(e) In addition to the duties contained in subdivisions (a), (b),(c), and (d), the commission shall distribute, as necessary, a training bulletin via the Internet to law
 enforcement agencies participating in the commission’s program on the topic of TBI and PTSD.

(f) The commission shall report to the Legislature, no later than June 30, 2012, on the extent to which peace officers are receiving adequate training in how to interact with persons suffering from TBI or PTSD.

(g) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (f) is inoperative on June 30, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   (SB 1296)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.40.

(a) The commission, in consultation with subject matter experts, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies, the Department of Justice Missing and Unidentified Persons Section, the California Health and Human Services Agency or its designee or designees, organizations with expertise in autism and wandering, organizations with expertise in Alzheimer’s disease and dementia and wandering, emergency management services agencies, and public transit agencies, shall, on or before January 1, 2026, develop guidelines addressing wandering associated
 with Alzheimer’s disease, autism, and dementia.

(b) The guidelines shall address, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Development of law enforcement investigational checklists.

(2) Protocols for deploying law enforcement agency resources, including, but not limited to, search and rescue dogs.

(3) Protocols for developing community awareness campaigns for wandering prevention and water safety.

(4) Technological solutions regarding all of the following:

(A) Wandering prevention devices.

(B) Proactive registries.

(C) Community alert systems.

(5) Coordination and communication protocols between law enforcement agencies and all of the following:

(A) Other local law enforcement agencies.

(B) First responders, including, but not limited to, emergency management services.

(C) 911 dispatch.

(D) Hospitals.

(E) Transportation systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (AB 2541)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.55.

Every city police officer or deputy sheriff at a supervisory level who is assigned field or investigative duties shall complete a high technology crimes and computer seizure training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training by January 1, 2000, or within 18 months of assignment to supervisory duties. Completion of the course may be satisfied by telecourse, video training tape, or other instruction. This training shall be offered to all city police officers and deputy sheriffs as part of continuing professional training. The training shall, at a minimum, address relevant laws, recognition of high technology crimes, and computer evidence collection and preservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13516.

(a) The commission shall prepare guidelines establishing standard procedures which may be followed by police agencies in the investigation of sexual assault cases, and cases involving the sexual exploitation or sexual abuse of children, including, police response to, and treatment of, victims of these crimes. 

(b) The course of training leading to the basic certificate issued by the commission shall, on and after July 1, 1977, include adequate instruction in the procedures described in subdivision (a). No reimbursement shall be made to local agencies based on attendance on or after that date at any course which does not comply with the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) The commission shall prepare and implement a course for the training of specialists in the investigation of sexual assault cases, child sexual exploitation cases, and child sexual abuse cases. Officers assigned to investigation duties which include the handling of cases involving the sexual exploitation or sexual abuse of children, shall successfully complete that training within six months of the date the assignment was made.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in the enactment of this section to encourage the establishment of sex crime investigation units in police agencies throughout the state, which units shall include, but not be limited to, investigating crimes involving the sexual exploitation and sexual abuse of children.

(e) It is the further intent of the Legislature in the enactment of this section to encourage the establishment of investigation guidelines that take into consideration the sensitive nature of the sexual exploitation and sexual abuse of children with respect to both the accused and the alleged victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 32, Sec. 3.   Effective March 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

13516.5.

(a) The commission shall develop and implement a course or courses of instruction for the training of peace officers in California on commercial sexual exploitation of children (CSEC) and victims of human trafficking that shall include, but not be limited to, the following topics and activities:

(1) The dynamics of commercial sexual exploitation of children.

(2) The impact of trauma on child development and manifestations of trauma in victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(3) Strategies to identify potential victims of commercial sexual exploitation, including indicators that a youth is being exploited.

(4) Mandatory reporting requirements related to commercial sexual exploitation.

(5) Appropriate interviewing, engagement, and intervention techniques that avoid retraumatizing the victim and promote collaboration with victim-serving agencies.

(6) Introduction to the purpose, scope, and use of specialized child victim interview resources.

(7) Local and state resources that are available to first responders.

(8) Perspectives of victims and their families.

(9) Issues of stigma.

(10) Any other critical topics identified by subject matter experts.

(b) The course of instruction shall be equivalent to a course that the commission produces for officers as part of continuing professional training and shall include facilitated discussions and learning activities, including scenario training exercises.

(c) The training described in subdivision (a) shall be developed with input from survivors of commercial sexual exploitation, the appropriate local and state agencies, and advocates that have expertise in CSEC and human trafficking. These shall include, but not be limited to, the California Child Welfare Council’s CSEC Action Team, organizations that provide services specifically to sexually exploited children, and public agencies leading or participating in interagency responses to commercially sexually exploited children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13517.

(a) The commission shall prepare guidelines establishing standard procedures which may be followed by police agencies in the detection, investigation, and response to cases in which a minor is a victim of an act of abuse or neglect prohibited by this code. The guidelines shall include procedures for determining whether or not a child should be taken into protective custody. The guidelines shall also include procedures for minimizing the number of times a child is interviewed by law enforcement personnel.

(b) The course of training leading to the basic certificate issued by the commission shall, not later than July 1, 1979, include adequate instruction in the procedures described in subdivision (a).

(c) The commission shall prepare and implement an optional course of training of specialists in the investigation of cases in which a minor is a victim of an act of abuse or neglect prohibited by this code.

(d) The commission shall consult with the State Office of Child Abuse Prevention in developing the guidelines and optional course of training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13517.5.

The commission shall prepare guidelines establishing standard procedures which may be followed by police agencies and prosecutors in interviewing minor witnesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13517.7.

(a) The commission shall develop guidelines and training for use by state and local law enforcement officers to address issues related to child safety when a caretaker parent or guardian is arrested.

(b) The guidelines and training shall, at a minimum, address the following subjects:

(1) Procedures to ensure that officers and custodial employees inquire whether an arrestee has minor dependent children without appropriate supervision.

(2) Authorizing additional telephone calls by arrestees so that they may arrange for the care of minor dependent children.

(3) Use of county child welfare services, as appropriate, and other similar service providers to assist in the placement of dependent children when the parent or guardian is unable or unwilling to arrange suitable care for the child or children.

(4) Identification of local government or nongovernmental agencies able to provide appropriate custodial services.

(5) Temporary supervision of minor children to ensure their safety and well-being.

(6) Sample procedures to assist state and local law enforcement agencies to develop ways to ensure the safety and well-being of children when the parent or guardian has been arrested.

(c) The commission shall use appropriate subject matter experts, including representatives of law enforcement and county child welfare agencies, in developing the guidelines and training required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 729, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13518.

(a) Every city police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, peace officer member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and police officer of a district authorized by statute to maintain a police department, except those whose duties are primarily clerical or administrative, shall meet the training standards prescribed by the Emergency Medical Services Authority for the administration of first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation. This training shall include instruction in the use of a portable manual mask and airway assembly designed to prevent the spread of communicable diseases. In addition, satisfactory completion of periodic refresher training or appropriate testing in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and other first aid as prescribed by the Emergency Medical Services Authority shall also be required.

(b) The course of training leading to the basic certificate issued by the commission shall include adequate instruction in the procedures described in subdivision (a). No reimbursement shall be made to local agencies based on attendance at any such course which does not comply with the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) As used in this section, “primarily clerical or administrative” means the performance of clerical or administrative duties for a minimum of 90 percent of the time worked within a pay period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13518.1.

In order to prevent the spread of communicable disease, a law enforcement agency employing peace officers described in subdivision (a) of Section 13518 may provide to each of these peace officers an appropriate portable manual mask and airway assembly for use when applying cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 46.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13518.5.

(a) Each peace officer in California who meets the criteria specified in subdivision (b) shall complete a course in basic maritime operations for law enforcement officers. The course of instruction shall include boat handling, chart reading, navigation rules, and comprehensive training regarding maritime boardings, arrest procedures, vessel identification, searches, and counterterrorism practices and procedures. The curriculum shall be consistent with applicable federal standards and tactical training.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to a peace officer who meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Is employed by a city, county, city and
 county, or district that has adopted a resolution pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(2) Is within a classification identified in the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) Is assigned in a jurisdiction that includes navigable waters.

(4) Serves as a crew member on a waterborne law enforcement vessel.

(c) This section shall become operative in a city, county, city and county, or district when both of the following apply:

(1) The federal Department of Homeland Security has provided funding to a law enforcement agency in a city, county, city and county, or district to implement this section.

(2) The governing body of the city, county, city and county, or district, such as the board of supervisors of a county or the city council, has adopted a resolution agreeing to implement this section and identifying the specific classifications of peace officers in the jurisdiction that will be subject to training pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   (AB 979)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.

(a) The commission shall implement by January 1, 1986, a course or courses of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in California in the handling of domestic violence complaints and also shall develop guidelines for law enforcement response to domestic violence. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall include a brief current and historical context on communities of color impacted by incarceration and violence, enforcement of criminal laws in domestic violence situations, availability of civil remedies and community resources, and protection of the victim. If appropriate, the training presenters shall include domestic violence experts, who may include victims of domestic violence and people who have
 committed domestic violence and have been or are in the process of being rehabilitated, with expertise in the delivery of direct services to victims and people who have committed domestic violence, including, but not limited to, utilizing the staff of domestic violence shelter-based programs in the presentation of training.

(b) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means any officer or employee of a local police department or sheriff’s office, a peace officer of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2, a peace officer of the University of California Police Department, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.2, a peace officer of the California State University Police Departments, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 830.2, a peace officer, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section
 830.31, or a peace officer as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.32.

(c) The course of basic training for law enforcement officers shall include adequate instruction in the procedures and techniques described below:

(1) The provisions set forth in Title 5 (commencing with Section 13700) relating to response, enforcement of court orders, and data collection.

(2) The legal duties imposed on peace officers to make arrests and offer protection and assistance including guidelines for making felony and misdemeanor arrests.

(3) Techniques for handling incidents of domestic violence that minimize the likelihood of injury to the officer and that
 promote the safety of the victim. These techniques shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Methods for ensuring victim interviews occur in a venue separate from the alleged perpetrator and with appropriate sound barriers to prevent the conversation from being overheard.

(B) Questions for the victim, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Whether the victim would like a followup visit to provide needed support or resources.

(ii) Information on obtaining a gun violence restraining order and a protective order described in Section 6218 of the Family Code.

(C) A
 verbal review of the resources available for victims outlined on the written notice provided pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 13701.

(4) The nature and extent of domestic violence.

(5) The signs of domestic violence.

(6) Criminal conduct that may be related to domestic violence, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Coercion, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 236.1, for purposes of committing or impeding the investigation or prosecution of domestic violence.

(B) False imprisonment, as defined in Section 236.

(C) Extortion, as defined in Section 518, and the use of fear, as described in Section 519.

(D) Identity theft, as defined in Section 530.5, impersonation through an internet website or by other electronic means, as defined in Section 528.5, false personation, as defined in Section 530, receiving money or property as a result of false personation, and mail theft.

(E) Stalking, as defined in Section 646.9, including by telephone or electronic communication.

(F) Nonconsensual pornography, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (j) of Section 647.

(7) The assessment of lethality or signs of lethal
 violence in domestic violence situations.

(8) The legal rights of, and remedies available to, victims of domestic violence.

(9) The use of an arrest by a private person in a domestic violence situation.

(10) Documentation, report writing, and evidence collection.

(11) Domestic violence diversion.

(12) Tenancy issues and domestic violence.

(13) The impact on children of law enforcement intervention in domestic violence.

(14) The services and facilities available to victims and
 batterers.

(15) The use and applications of this code in domestic violence situations.

(16) Verification and enforcement of temporary restraining orders when (A) the suspect is present and (B) the suspect has fled.

(17) Verification and enforcement of stay-away orders.

(18) Cite and release policies.

(19) Emergency assistance to victims and how to assist victims in pursuing criminal justice options.

(d) The guidelines developed by the commission shall also incorporate the factors described in subdivision (c), and the following procedures and techniques:

(1) Identification and detection of staged crime scenes.

(2) Working with a multidisciplinary team in the handling of domestic violence cases.

(3) Indicators of domestic homicide in suspicious death cases, including all of the following:

(A) The
 decedent died prematurely or in an untimely manner.

(B) The scene of the death gives the appearance of death due to suicide or accident.

(C) One partner wanted to end the relationship.

(D) There is a history of being victimized by domestic violence that includes coercive control.

(E) The decedent is found dead in a home or place of residence.

(F) The decedent is found by a current or previous partner.

(G) There is a history of being victimized by domestic violence that includes strangulation or suffocation.

(H) The current or previous partner of the decedent, or
 child of the decedent or the decedent’s current or previous partner, is the last to see the decedent alive.

(I) The partner had control of the scene before law enforcement arrived.

(J) The body of the decedent has been moved or the scene or other evidence is altered in some way.

(e) Local law enforcement agencies are encouraged to include, as a part of their advanced officer training program, periodic updates and training on domestic violence. The commission shall assist where possible.

(f) (1) The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in
 consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of domestic violence. The groups and individuals shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: one representative each from the California Peace Officers’ Association, the Peace Officers Research Association of California, the State Bar of California, the California Women Lawyers, and the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls; two representatives from the commission; two representatives from the California Partnership to End Domestic Violence; two peace officers, recommended by the commission, who are experienced in the provision of domestic violence training; two domestic violence experts, recommended by the California Partnership to End Domestic Violence, who are experienced in the provision of direct services to victims of domestic violence; and at least one representative of
 service providers serving the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community in connection with domestic violence. At least one of the persons selected shall be a former victim of domestic violence; one representative of an organization working to advance criminal justice reform; and one representative of an organization working to advance racial justice.

(2) The commission, in consultation with these groups and individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine in what ways domestic violence training might be included as a part of ongoing programs.

(g) Each law enforcement officer below the rank of supervisor who is assigned to patrol duties and would normally respond to domestic violence calls or incidents of domestic violence shall complete, every two
 years, an updated course of instruction on domestic violence that is developed according to the standards and guidelines developed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (d). The instruction required pursuant to this subdivision shall be funded from existing resources available for the training required pursuant to this section. It is the intent of the Legislature not to increase the annual training costs of local government entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 654, Sec. 5.   (SB 989)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.05.

(a) The commission shall implement by January 1, 2002, a course or courses of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in California in the handling of stalking complaints and also shall develop guidelines for law enforcement response to stalking. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall stress enforcement of criminal laws in stalking situations, availability of civil remedies and community resources, and protection of the victim. Where appropriate, the training presenters shall include stalking experts with expertise in the delivery of direct services to victims of stalking. Completion of the course may be satisfied by telecommunication, video training tape, or other instruction.

(b) (1) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means any officer or employee of a local police department or sheriff’s office, any peace officer of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2, any peace officer of the University of California Police Department, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.2, any peace officer of the California State University Police Departments, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 830.2, a peace officer, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31, or a peace officer as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.32.

(2) As used in this section, “stalking” means the offense defined in Section 646.9.

(c) (1) The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of stalking.

(2) The commission, in consultation with these groups and individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine in what ways stalking training might be included as a part of ongoing programs.

(d) Participation in the course or courses specified in this section by peace officers or the agencies employing them, is voluntary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.07.
